Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.404, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Special provision; city of St. Paul. new text begin (a) new text end The city of St. Paul may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Fitzgerald Theatre, the Great American History Theater at 30 East 10th Street, and the Brave New Workshop at the Palace Theater at 17 West Seventh Place, notwithstanding the limitations of law, or local ordinance, or charter provision relating to zoning or school or church distances. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week to holders of tickets for performances presented by the theatre and to members of the nonprofit corporation holding the license and to their guests. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any other law, local ordinance, or charter provision, the city of St. Paul may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Science Museum of Minnesota, or its concessionaire or operator, for use on the premises of the Science Museum of Minnesota at 120 West Kellogg Boulevard. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any other law, local ordinance, or charter provision, the city of St. Paul may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Union Depot, or its concessionaire or operator, for use on the premises of the Union Depot at 214 Fourth Street East. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the St. Paul City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end